Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.037

Human rights commission proceedings.

When requested by the state human rights commission, the chief administrative law judge shall assign an administrative law judge to conduct proceedings under chapter 49.60 RCW.

[ 1985 c 185 s 29.]